Hawaii statutes.
§188-50 License; application; fees;
restrictions. (a) It is unlawful for any person, except children below
nine years of age, to fish, take, or catch any introduced freshwater game fish
without first obtaining a license. Children exempt by this section may fish,
provided they are accompanied by a licensed person. The department of land and
natural resources may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 necessary for the
purposes of this chapter and to set fees for freshwater game fish fishing.

(b) The licenses may be issued by agents of
the department of land and natural resources upon written application in such
form as may be prescribed by the department together with payment of a fee.
The fees for licenses and duplicate licenses shall be established by the
department by rules adopted in accordance with chapter 91.

(c) No person to whom a license has been
issued under this section shall permit any other person to carry, display, or
use the license for any purpose. Every person to whom a license has been
issued under this section shall show the license upon demand of any officer
authorized to enforce the fishing laws of the State. No person shall refuse
any officer the examination or inspection of any bag or container of any kind
used to carry fish or any vehicle or conveyance used to transport fish.

The department, upon written application, may
issue a permit to a club or group of minors, not less than five in number, for
unlicensed fishing where such activity will be supervised by responsible
adults. All adults accompanying the excursions, however, shall themselves be
licensed. The application shall state the area to be visited, the dates for
the excursion, the name of the organization or group, and shall be signed by an
adult advisor of the group. The permits shall expire and become void thirty
days after issuance. The department may determine other terms and conditions
of the permits.

(d) Where a bag limit is specified for the
catching of freshwater fish, each licensee may take only one bag per day. This
restriction to one bag applies to each minor participating in unlicensed group
excursions for which permits have been issued under this section. The catch of
a child below the age of nine years shall be deemed part of the catch of the
licensed adult accompanying the child.

(e) The department may revoke any license for
any infraction of the terms and conditions of the license. Any person whose
license has been revoked shall not be eligible to apply for another license
until expiration of one year from the date of revocation.

(f) The department shall suspend, refuse to
renew, reinstate, or restore, or deny any license or application if the
department has received certification from the child support enforcement agency
pursuant to section 576D-13 that the licensee or applicant is not in compliance
with an order of support as defined in section 576D-1 or has failed to comply
with a subpoena or warrant relating to a paternity or child support
proceeding. The department shall issue, renew, restore, or reinstate a license
only upon receipt of an authorization from the child support enforcement
agency, the office of child support hearings, or the family court. [L Sp 1949,
c 57, §2; am L 1955, c 29, §2; RL 1955, §21-83; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L
1961, c 132, §2; HRS §188-50; am L 1974, c 224, §1; am L 1981, c 85, §57; gen
ch 1985; am L 1988, c 117, §2; am L 1997, c 293, §11; am L 2002, c 86, §5]

Note

The amendment made by L 2014, c 218, §8 is not included in
this section.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next